Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-850
Municipal bidding procedure; waiver;
when.

Notwithstanding
any charter or statutory provisions or restrictions, any municipal bidding
procedure may be waived by the city council of a city of the primary class
when required to comply with any federal grant, loan, or program.

Laws 2011, LB335, § 2.